ru: Строй укулеле: DGBE (баритон); EADG (бас-укулеле); GCEA (низкая G; GCEA (стандартная; линейная); ре-энстрантная высокая G); Другое
sk-SK: Ladenie ukulele: DGBE (barytónové); EADG (basové ukulele); GCEA (nízke G; GCEA (štandardné; lineárne); reentrantné vysoké G); Iné
pt-BR: Ukulele afinação: DGBE (barítono); EADG (ukulele baixo); GCEA (G grave; GCEA (padrão; linear); reentrante G agudo); Outro
cs: Ladění ukulele: DGBE (barytonové); EADG (basové ukulele); GCEA (Low G; GCEA (standardní; lineární); re-entrantní High G); Ostatní
fi: Ukulelen viritys: DGBE (baritoni); EADG (bassoukulele); GCEA (matala G; GCEA (vakio; lineaarinen); re-entrant, korkea G); Muu
ja: ウクレレチューニング: DGBE (バリトン); EADG (ベースウクレレ); GCEA (Low-G; GCEA (スタンダード; リニア); リエントラント High-G); その他
pl: Strój ukulele: DGBE (barytonowe); EADG (ukulele basowe); GCEA (niskie G; GCEA (standardowe; liniowe); re-entrant wysokie G); Inne
vi: Cách chỉnh dây đàn ukulele: DGBE (baritone); EADG (bass ukulele); GCEA (G thấp; GCEA (tiêu chuẩn; tuyến tính); G cao lặp lại); Khác
bg-BG: Настройка на укулелето: DGBE (баритон); EADG (бас укулеле); GCEA (ниско G; GCEA (стандартна; линейна); реентрантна, високо G); Друга
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗調音: DGBE (上低音); EADG (貝斯烏克麗麗); GCEA (Low G; GCEA (標準; 順階); 折返 High G); 其他
es: Afinación del ukelele: DGBE (barítono); EADG (ukelele bajo); GCEA (G grave; GCEA (estándar; lineal); reentrante con G agudo); Otro
hr-HR: Podešavanje ukulele: DGBE (bariton); EADG (bas ukulele); GCEA (niski G; GCEA (standardno; linearno); re-entrant visoki G); Ostalo
en: Ukulele tuning: DGBE (baritone); EADG (bass ukulele); GCEA (low G; GCEA (standard; linear); re-entrant high G); Other
da: Ukulelestemning: DGBE (baryton); EADG (bas-ukulele); GCEA (lavt G; GCEA (standard; lineær); re-entrant højt G); Andet
ko: 우쿨렐레 튜닝: DGBE(바리톤); EADG(베이스 우쿨렐레); GCEA(Low G; GCEA(스탠다드; 리니어); 리엔트런트 High G); 기타
el: Κούρδισμα ουκουλέλε: DGBE (βαρύτονο); EADG (μπάσο γιουκαλίλι); GCEA (χαμηλό G; GCEA (τυπικό; γραμμικό); re-entrant υψηλό G); Άλλο
hu: Ukulele hangolása: DGBE (bariton); EADG (basszus ukulele); GCEA (mély G; GCEA (standard; lineáris); re-entrant magas G); Egyéb
th: การตั้งสายอูคูเลเล่: DGBE (บาริโทน); EADG (เบสอูคูเลเล่); GCEA (Low G; GCEA (มาตรฐาน; แบบ Linear); แบบ Re-entrant High G); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Afinação do ukulele: DGBE (barítono); EADG (ukulele baixo); GCEA (G grave; GCEA (standard; linear); reentrante G agudo); Outro
nl: Ukulele stemming: DGBE (bariton); EADG (basukelele); GCEA (lage G; GCEA (standaard; lineair); re-entrant hoge G); Anders
de: Stimmung der Ukulele: DGBE (Bariton); EADG (Bass-Ukulele); GCEA (Low G; GCEA (Standard; linear); rückläufig, High G); Andere
tr: Ukulele akortu: DGBE (bariton); EADG (bas ukulele); GCEA (kalın Sol; GCEA (standart; doğrusal); re-entrant ince Sol); Diğer
ro-RO: Acordarea ukulelei: DGBE (bariton); EADG (ukulele bas); GCEA (G grav; GCEA (standard; liniar); re-entrant G înalt); Altele
sl-SI: Uglaševanje ukuleleja: DGBE (bariton); EADG (bas ukulele); GCEA (nizki G; GCEA (standardni; linearni); re-entrant visoki G); Drugo
zh-CN: 尤克里里调音: DGBE（上低音）; EADG（贝斯尤克里里）; GCEA（低 G; GCEA（标准; 线性）; 折返高 G）; 其他
nb: Ukulele-stemming: DGBE (baryton); EADG (bassukulele); GCEA (lav G; GCEA (standard; lineær); re-entrant høy G); Annet
lt-LT: Ukulelės derinimas: DGBE (baritonas); EADG (bosinė ukulelė); GCEA (žemas G; GCEA (standartinis; linijinis); „re-entrant“, aukštas G); Kita
sv: Ukulele-stämning: DGBE (baryton); EADG (basukulele); GCEA (låg G; GCEA (standard; linjär); re-entrant hög G); Övrigt
fr: Accordage de l’ukulélé: DGBE (baryton); EADG (ukulélé basse); GCEA (Sol grave; GCEA (standard; linéaire); rentrant Sol aigu); Autre
it: Accordatura dell'ukulele: DGBE (baritono); EADG (ukulele basso); GCEA (Sol basso; GCEA (standard; lineare); rientrante, Sol alto); Altro